en: millet seed
de: Hirsekörner
es: semillas de mijo
fr: graines de millet
hr: sjeme prosa
it: semi di miglio
nl: gierstkorrels, gierst zaden, gierstzaden, gierstzaad
sv: hirsfrö

de: Goldhirse, geschälte Hirse, Gold-Hirse
fr: millet décortiqué

en: foxtail millet
hr: lisičji rep proso
it: miglio di coda di volpe

en: finger millet, Ragi
hr: prst proso
it: miglio cinese

en: kodo millet
hr: kodo proso
it: miglio Kodo

en: little millet
hr: malo prosa
it: miglio piccolo

en: barnyard millet
hr: barnyard proso
it: miglio di cortile

en: amaranth
ar: الامارانت
az: qaratərə
bg: амарант
br: amarant
ca: amarant
cs: amarant, laskavec
de: Amarant
es: amaranto
eu: amaranto
fa: تاج خروس
fi: meksikonrevonhäntä, amarantti, revonhännät
fr: amarante
ga: amarantas
he: ירבוז
hi: |चौलाई}}
hr: amarant
hu: disznóparéj, amaránt
hy: Հավակատար
io: amaranto
it: amaranto
ja: アマランサス
jv: bayem
kk: Амарант
la: Amaranthus caudatus, Amaranthus cruentus, Amaranthus hypochondriacus
ln: bítɛkutɛku
lt: burnotis
mt: għobbejra
nl: amaranth
pl: szarłat, amarantus, amarantusa, amarantusowy, amarantusowa, amarantusowe
pt: amaranto
qu: sankurachi
ro: amarant
ru: Амарант
sa: |वास्तुकम्}}
sk: amarant
sl: amarante, amaranta
sr: амарант
su: bayem
tr: amaranthus
uk: Щириця
vi: chi dền
zh: 苋属

en: amaranth flour
da: amarantmel
de: Amarantmehl
es: harina de amaranto
fi: amaranttijauho
fr: farine d’amarante
hr: brašno od amaranta
hu: disznóparéjliszt
it: farina d'amaranto
nl: amaranthmeel, amarant gemalen
pl: mąka z amarantusa, mąka amarantusowa
sl: amarente flour
sv: amarantmel

en: whole grain amaranth flour
de: Amaranthvollkornmehl, Amaranth-Vollkornmehl
hr: brašno od cijelog zrna amaranta
it: farina integrale di amaranto

fr: amarante soufflé
ar: منتفخ الامارانت
de: gepuffter Amaranth
es: amaranto inflado
hr: ekspandirani amarant
sr: експандиран амарант

en: oat
am: ገረማ
an: cevada
ar: شوفان
az: əkin yulafı
ba: һоло
be: авёс
bg: овес
bn: জই
bo: ཡུག་པོ།
br: kerc'h
bs: zob
ca: civada
cs: oves
cy: ceirch
da: havre
de: hafer
el: βρώμη
eo: aveno
es: avena
et: kaer, kaera
eu: olo
fa: جو دوسر
fi: kaura
fr: avoine
ga: coirce
gd: coirce
gl: avea
he: שיבולת
hi: जई
hr: zob, zobi, zobene
ht: avwàn
hu: zab
id: haver
is: hafrar
it: avena
ja: エンバク, オーツ麦
jv: haver
ka: შვრია
kk: екпе сұлы
kn: ತೋಕೆ ಗೋಧಿ
ko: 귀리
ku: gîhagulî
ky: сулу
la: avena sativa
li: haver
lt: sėjamoji aviža, avižos, avižų
lv: sējas auzas, auzu, auzas
mk: овес
ml: ഓട്സ്
mn: таримал хошуу будаа
mr: ओट
ms: oat
mt: ħafur
nb: havre
nl: haver
nn: havre
oc: civada
pa: ਜਵੀ
pl: owsiana, owies, owsiane, owsiany, owsianej, owsianego, owsianych, owsa
pt: aveia
qu: tarpuy awina
ro: ovăz, ovaz
ru: овёс
sc: avena
sh: zob
si: යව
sk: ovos
sl: oves
so: sareen
sq: tërshëra
sr: овас
sv: havre
sw: oti
ta: காடைக்கண்ணி
te: వోట్
th: ข้าวโอ๊ต
tl: obena
tr: beyaz yulaf
tt: игүле солы
uk: овес
ur: جئی
uz: suli
vi: yến mạch
wa: avoenne
yi: האבער
zh: 燕麦

en: oat grain
de: Haferkerne
es: granos de avena
fi: kauranjyvä, kauranjyviä, kauranjyvät
fr: grains d'avoine
hr: zobena prekrup
it: avena in grani
sv: havre korn

en: wholemeal oat, wholegrain oats, whole grain oats
ca: civada integral
de: Vollkornhafer, Vollkorn-Hafer, Hafervollkorn
el: Βρώμη ολικής άλεσης
es: Avena integral, Avena entera en grano
et: täisterakaer
fi: täysjyväkaura
fr: avoine complète, Avoine complet
hr: integralna zob
hu: teljes kiőrlésű zab
it: Avena integrale
nl: volkoren haver
pl: pełnoziarnisty owies, owsiane pełnoziarniste, owies pełnoziarnisty
sv: fullkornshavre

en: gluten free oats
ca: civada sense gluten
de: glutenfreier Hafer
es: avena sin gluten, avena libre de gluten
fi: gluteeniton kaura
fr: avoine sans gluten
hr: zob bez glutena
it: avena senza glutine
sv: glutenfri havre

en: oat flakes, oatflakes, rolled oats, oatmeal flakes
af: hawermout
ar: رقانق الشوفان
bg: овесени ядки, овесен флейкс, овесени люспи
ca: flocs de civada
cs: ovesné vločky
da: havregryn, havreflager
de: haferflocken
el: νιφάφες βρώμης
eo: avenflokoj
es: copos de avena, hojuela de avena
et: kaerahelbed
eu: olo-malutak
fi: kaurahiutale, kaurahiutaleet, kaurahiutaleita
fr: flocons d'avoine, flocon d'avoine
he: פתיתי שיבולת שועל
hr: zobene pahuljice, valjani zob
hu: zabpehely
hy: Վարսակի փաթիլներ
it: fiocchi di avena, fiocchi d'avena
ja: ロールド・オーツ, オート麦フレーク
jv: Oat gulung
ko: 납작귀리
lt: avižiniai dribsniai, avižų dribsniai
lv: auzu pārslas
ms: emping oat
nb: havregryn
nl: havermoutvlokken, havermout, havervlokken, havervlok
pl: płatki owsiane, płatków owsianych, płatki owsiane górskie
pt: flocos de aveia
ro: fulgi de ovăz
ru: овсяные хлопья, хлопья овсяные
sk: ovsené vločky
sl: ovseni kosmiči
sr: ovsene pahuljice
sv: havreflingor, havreflager, havregryn, gryn av havre
th: เกล็ดข้าวโอ๊ต
tr: tahıl ezmesi, yulaf ezmesi
uk: вівсяні пластівці
zh: 大燕麥片

en: instant oatmeal, thin-rolled oats
it: fiocchi d'avena istantanei
pl: płatki owsiane błyskawiczne

en: gluten-free oat flakes
bg: безглутенови овесени ядки
de: glutenfreie Haferflocken
es: Hojuelas de avena libres de gluten
fi: gluteeniton kaurahiutale
fr: flocons d'avoine sans gluten
hr: zobene pahuljice bez glutena
hu: gluténmentes zabpehely
it: fiocchi di avena senza glutine, fiocchi d'avena senza glutine
pl: płatki owsiane bezglutenowe, bezglutenowe płatki owsiane
sv: glutenfria havregryn

en: whole grain oat flakes, wholegrain oat flakes, whole grain rolled oats, whole oat flakes
ca: floca de civada integral, flocs de civada integral
da: fullkornshavregryn
de: Vollkorn-Haferflocken, Vollkornhaferflocken, Vollkorn haferflocken, Hafervollkornflocken, Vollkornhaferschrot
es: copos de avena integrales, copos de avena integral, copos de avena integral laminados, Avena integral laminada
et: täisterakaerahelbed, täistera kaerahelbed
fi: täysjyväkaurahiutale
fr: Flocon d'avoine complet, flocons d'avoine complète, flocon d'avoine complète, flocons d'avoine complet, flocons d'avoine complets
hr: zobene pahuljice od cjelovitog zrna, zobene pahuljice iz cijelog zrna
hu: teljes kiőrlésű zabpehely
it: fiocchi di avena integrale, fiocchi d'avena integrale, Fiocchi d'avena integrali
lt: pilno grūdo avižiniai dribsniai, viso grūdo avižų dribsniai
lv: pilngraudu auzu pārslas
nl: volkoren havermout, volkoren havervlokken, volkorenhavervlokken
nn: fullkornshavregryn
pl: płatki owsiane z pełnego przemiału, płatki owsiane pełnoziarniste, pełnoziarniste płatki owsiane, płatki z pełnego ziarna owsa
pt: flocos de aveia integral, flocos integrais de aveia
sl: ovseni polnozrnati kosmiči
sv: fullkornshavregryn, fullkorn havregryn

en: british wholegrain oat flakes
de: britische Hafervollkornflocken
hr: britanske cjelovite zobene pahuljice
it: fiocchi di avena integrali britannici